Ohio, session 136, HB440.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Ohio: Section 1. That sections 4723.091, 4723.092, and 4723.28 of the Revised Code be amended to read as follows: Sec. 4723.091. (A) An (A)(1) Each of the following shall submit a request to the bureau of criminal identification and investigation for a criminal records check of that individual: (a) An individual who applies for licensure under section 4723.09 of the Revised Code; (b) An individual who applies for issuance of a certificate under section 4723.651, 4723.75, 4723.85, or 4723.89 of the Revised Code; (c) An individual who applies for reactivation of a license, under division (D) of section 4723.24 of the Revised Code, that has been inactive for at least five years; or (d) An individual who applies for reinstatement of a license, under division (D) of section 4723.24 of the Revised Code, that has lapsed for at least five years shall submit a request to the bureau of criminal identification and investigation for a criminal records check of the applicant; (e) An individual who applies for a volunteer nursing certificate under section 4723.26 of the Revised Code and has been retired from practice for at least ten years; (f) An individual who, as part of an investigation by the board of nursing, is subject to an order by the board under division (F) of section 4723.28 of the Revised Code. The request shall be made in accordance with section 109.572 of the Revised Code. (B) An applicant (2) As part of the request for a criminal records check, the individual requesting a criminal records the check under division (A) of this section shall also ask do both of the following: (a) Under the form and methods described in division (C) of section 109.572 of the Revised Code, submit one complete set of fingerprint impressions directly to the superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation for the purpose of conducting the check; (b) Ask the superintendent to request that the federal bureau of investigation send provide to the superintendent any information the federal bureau of investigation has with respect to the applicantindividual. (C)(B) On receipt of all items required for the commencement of a criminal records check pursuant to requested under division (A) of this section, the bureau of criminal identification and investigation shall conduct a the criminal records check of the applicantindividual requesting the check. The superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation also shall request that the federal bureau of investigation provide to the superintendent any information the federal bureau of investigation has with respect to the individual. On the On completion of the criminal records check, the bureau of criminal identification and investigation shall send the results report to the board of nursing the results of the check and any information the federal bureau of investigation provides the superintendent. (D)(C) The results of a criminal records check conducted pursuant to a request made under division (A)(B) of this section, any information provided by the federal bureau of investigation as described in that division, and any report containing those results, or information are not public records for purposes of section 149.43 of the Revised Code and shall not be made available to any person or for any purpose other than the followinggovernment entity except as follows: (1) The results may be made available to any person To the individual who is the subject of the check; (2) To the board of nursing for use in determining under section 4723.09, 4723.651, 4723.75, 4723.85, or 4723.89 of the Revised Code whether any of the following about the individual who is the subject of the check: (a) Whether the individual who is the subject of the check should be granted a license or certificate under this chapter or whether section 4723.09, 4723.26, 4723.651, 4723.75, 4723.85, or 4723.89 of the Revised Code; (b) Whether any temporary permit granted to the individual under section 4723.09 of the Revised Code has terminated automatically. (2) The results may be made available to any person for use in determining under division (D) of section 4723.24 of the Revised Code whether ; (c) Whether the individual who is the subject of the check should have the individual's license or certificate reactivated or reinstated. (3) The results may be made available to any person for use in determining under section 4723.28 of the Revised Code whether under division (D) of section 4723.24 of the Revised Code; (d) Whether the individual who is the subject of the check should be subject to disciplinary action in accordance with that section 4723.28 of the Revised Code. (4) The results may be made available to the individual who is the subject of the check or that individual's representative. Sec. 4723.092. The board of nursing shall not refuse to issue a license under section 4723.09 of the Revised Code or a certificate under section 4723.26, 4723.651, 4723.75, 4723.85, or 4723.89 of the Revised Code because of a conviction of, plea of guilty to, a judicial finding of guilt of, a judicial finding of guilt resulting from a plea of no contest to, or a judicial finding of eligibility for a pretrial diversion or similar program or for intervention in lieu of a conviction for a criminal offense unless the refusal is in accordance with section 9.79 of the Revised Code. Sec. 4723.28. (A) The board of nursing, by a vote of a quorum, may impose one or more of the following sanctions if it finds that a person committed fraud in passing an examination required to obtain a nursing license or dialysis technician certificate issued by the board or to have committed fraud, misrepresentation, or deception in applying for or securing any a nursing license or dialysis technician certificate issued by the board: deny, revoke, suspend, or place restrictions on any nursing license or dialysis technician certificate issued by the board; reprimand or otherwise discipline a holder of a nursing license or dialysis technician certificate; or impose a fine of not more than five hundred dollars per violation. (B) Except as provided in section 4723.092 of the Revised Code, the board of nursing, by a vote of a quorum, may impose one or more of the following sanctions: deny, revoke, suspend, or place restrictions on any nursing license or dialysis technician certificate issued by the board; reprimand or otherwise discipline a holder of a nursing license or dialysis technician certificate; or impose a fine of not more than five hundred dollars per violation. The sanctions may be imposed for any of the following: (1) Denial, revocation, suspension, or restriction of authority to engage in a licensed profession or practice a health care occupation, including nursing or practice as a dialysis technician, for any reason other than a failure to renew, in Ohio or another state or jurisdiction; (2) Engaging in the practice of nursing or engaging in practice as a dialysis technician, having failed to renew a nursing license or dialysis technician certificate issued under this chapter, or while a nursing license or dialysis technician certificate is under suspension; (3) Conviction of, a plea of guilty to, a judicial finding of guilt of, a judicial finding of guilt resulting from a plea of no contest to, or a judicial finding of eligibility for a pretrial diversion or similar program or for intervention in lieu of conviction for, a misdemeanor committed in the course of practice; (4) Conviction of, a plea of guilty to, a judicial finding of guilt of, a judicial finding of guilt resulting from a plea of no contest to, or a judicial finding of eligibility for a pretrial diversion or similar program or for intervention in lieu of conviction for, any felony or of any crime involving gross immorality or moral turpitude; (5) Selling, giving away, or administering drugs or therapeutic devices for other than legal and legitimate therapeutic purposes; or conviction of, a plea of guilty to, a judicial finding of guilt of, a judicial finding of guilt resulting from a plea of no contest to, or a judicial finding of eligibility for a pretrial diversion or similar program or for intervention in lieu of conviction for, violating any municipal, state, county, or federal drug law; (6) Conviction of, a plea of guilty to, a judicial finding of guilt of, a judicial finding of guilt resulting from a plea of no contest to, or a judicial finding of eligibility for a pretrial diversion or similar program or for intervention in lieu of conviction for, an act in another jurisdiction that would constitute a felony or a crime of moral turpitude in Ohio; (7) Conviction of, a plea of guilty to, a judicial finding of guilt of, a judicial finding of guilt resulting from a plea of no contest to, or a judicial finding of eligibility for a pretrial diversion or similar program or for intervention in lieu of conviction for, an act in the course of practice in another jurisdiction that would constitute a misdemeanor in Ohio; (8) Self-administering or otherwise taking into the body any dangerous drug, as defined in section 4729.01 of the Revised Code, in any way that is not in accordance with a legal, valid prescription issued for that individual, or self-administering or otherwise taking into the body any drug that is a schedule I controlled substance; (9) Habitual or excessive use of controlled substances, other habit-forming drugs, or alcohol or other chemical substances to an extent that impairs the individual's ability to provide safe nursing care or safe dialysis care; (10) Impairment of the ability to practice according to acceptable and prevailing standards of safe nursing care or safe dialysis care because of the use of drugs, alcohol, or other chemical substances; (11) Impairment of the ability to practice according to acceptable and prevailing standards of safe nursing care or safe dialysis care because of a physical or mental disability; (12) Assaulting or causing harm to a patient or depriving a patient of the means to summon assistance; (13) Misappropriation or attempted misappropriation of money or anything of value in the course of practice; (14) Adjudication by a probate court of being mentally ill or mentally incompetent. The board may reinstate the person's nursing license or dialysis technician certificate upon adjudication by a probate court of the person's restoration to competency or upon submission to the board of other proof of competency. (15) The suspension or termination of employment by the United States department of defense or department of veterans affairs for any act that violates or would violate this chapter; (16) Violation of this chapter or any rules adopted under it; (17) Violation of any restrictions placed by the board on a nursing license or dialysis technician certificate; (18) Failure to use universal and standard precautions established by rules adopted under section 4723.07 of the Revised Code; (19) Failure to practice in accordance with acceptable and prevailing standards of safe nursing care or safe dialysis care; (20) In the case of a registered nurse, engaging in activities that exceed the practice of nursing as a registered nurse; (21) In the case of a licensed practical nurse, engaging in activities that exceed the practice of nursing as a licensed practical nurse; (22) In the case of a dialysis technician, engaging in activities that exceed those permitted under section 4723.72 of the Revised Code; (23) Aiding and abetting a person in that person's practice of nursing without a license or practice as a dialysis technician without a certificate issued under this chapter; (24) In the case of an advanced practice registered nurse, except as provided in division (M) of this section, either of the following: (a) Waiving the payment of all or any part of a deductible or copayment that a patient, pursuant to a health insurance or health care policy, contract, or plan that covers such nursing services, would otherwise be required to pay if the waiver is used as an enticement to a patient or group of patients to receive health care services from that provider; (b) Advertising that the nurse will waive the payment of all or any part of a deductible or copayment that a patient, pursuant to a health insurance or health care policy, contract, or plan that covers such nursing services, would otherwise be required to pay. (25) Failure to comply with the terms and conditions of participation in the safe haven program conducted under sections 4723.35 and 4723.351 of the Revised Code; (26) Failure to comply with the terms and conditions required under the practice intervention and improvement program established under section 4723.282 of the Revised Code; (27) In the case of an advanced practice registered nurse: (a) Engaging in activities that exceed those permitted for the nurse's nursing specialty under section 4723.43 of the Revised Code; (b) Failure to meet the quality assurance standards established under section 4723.07 of the Revised Code. (28) In the case of an advanced practice registered nurse other than a certified registered nurse anesthetist, failure to maintain a standard care arrangement in accordance with section 4723.431 of the Revised Code or to practice in accordance with the standard care arrangement; (29) In the case of an advanced practice registered nurse who is designated as a clinical nurse specialist, certified nurse-midwife, or certified nurse practitioner, failure to prescribe drugs and therapeutic devices in accordance with section 4723.481 of the Revised Code; (30) Prescribing any drug or device to perform or induce an abortion, or otherwise performing or inducing an abortion; (31) Failure to establish and maintain professional boundaries with a patient, as specified in rules adopted under section 4723.07 of the Revised Code; (32) Regardless of whether the contact or verbal behavior is consensual, engaging with a patient other than the spouse of the registered nurse, licensed practical nurse, or dialysis technician in any of the following: (a) Sexual contact, as defined in section 2907.01 of the Revised Code; (b) Verbal behavior that is sexually demeaning to the patient or may be reasonably interpreted by the patient as sexually demeaning. (33) Assisting suicide, as defined in section 3795.01 of the Revised Code; (34) Failure to comply with the requirements in section 3719.061 of the Revised Code before issuing for a minor a prescription for an opioid analgesic, as defined in section 3719.01 of the Revised Code; (35) Failure to comply with section 4723.487 of the Revised Code, unless the state board of pharmacy no longer maintains a drug database pursuant to section 4729.75 of the Revised Code; (36) The revocation, suspension, restriction, reduction, or termination of clinical privileges by the United States department of defense or department of veterans affairs or the termination or suspension of a certificate of registration to prescribe drugs by the drug enforcement administration of the United States department of justice; (37) In the case of an advanced practice registered nurse who is designated as a clinical nurse specialist, certified nurse-midwife, or certified nurse practitioner, failure to comply with the terms of a consult agreement entered into with a pharmacist pursuant to section 4729.39 of the Revised Code; (38) Violation of section 4723.93 of the Revised Code; (39) Failure to cooperate with an investigation conducted by the board under this chapter, including failure to comply with a subpoena or order issued by the board or failure to answer truthfully a question presented by the board in an investigative interview, in an investigative office conference, at a deposition, or in written interrogatories, except that failure to cooperate with an investigation does not constitute grounds for discipline if a court of competent jurisdiction has issued an order that either quashes a subpoena or permits the individual to withhold testimony or evidence at issue. (C) Disciplinary actions taken by the board under divisions (A) and (B) of this section shall be taken pursuant to an adjudication conducted under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, except that in lieu of a hearing, the board may enter into a consent agreement with an individual to resolve an allegation of a violation of this chapter or any rule adopted under it. A consent agreement, when ratified by a vote of a quorum, shall constitute the findings and order of the board with respect to the matter addressed in the agreement. If the board refuses to ratify a consent agreement, the admissions and findings contained in the agreement shall be of no effect. (D) The hearings of the board shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, the board may appoint a hearing examiner, as provided in section 119.09 of the Revised Code, to conduct any hearing the board is authorized to hold under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. In any instance in which the board is required under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to give notice of an opportunity for a hearing and the applicant, licensee, or certificate holder does not make a timely request for a hearing in accordance with section 119.07 of the Revised Code, the board is not required to hold a hearing, but may adopt, by a vote of a quorum, a final order that contains the board's findings. In the final order, the board may order any of the sanctions listed in division (A) or (B) of this section. (E) If a criminal action is brought against a registered nurse, licensed practical nurse, or dialysis technician for an act or crime described in divisions (B)(3) to (7) of this section and the action is dismissed by the trial court other than on the merits, the board shall conduct an adjudication to determine whether the registered nurse, licensed practical nurse, or dialysis technician committed the act on which the action was based. If the board determines on the basis of the adjudication that the registered nurse, licensed practical nurse, or dialysis technician committed the act, or if the registered nurse, licensed practical nurse, or dialysis technician fails to participate in the adjudication, the board may take action as though the registered nurse, licensed practical nurse, or dialysis technician had been convicted of the act. If the board takes action on the basis of a conviction, plea, or a judicial finding as described in divisions (B)(3) to (7) of this section that is overturned on appeal, the registered nurse, licensed practical nurse, or dialysis technician may, on exhaustion of the appeal process, petition the board for reconsideration of its action. On receipt of the petition and supporting court documents, the board shall temporarily rescind its action. If the board determines that the decision on appeal was a decision on the merits, it shall permanently rescind its action. If the board determines that the decision on appeal was not a decision on the merits, it shall conduct an adjudication to determine whether the registered nurse, licensed practical nurse, or dialysis technician committed the act on which the original conviction, plea, or judicial finding was based. If the board determines on the basis of the adjudication that the registered nurse, licensed practical nurse, or dialysis technician committed such act, or if the registered nurse, licensed practical nurse, or dialysis technician does not request an adjudication, the board shall reinstate its action; otherwise, the board shall permanently rescind its action. Notwithstanding the provision of division (D)(2) of section 2953.32 or division (F)(1) of section 2953.39 of the Revised Code specifying that if records pertaining to a criminal case are sealed or expunged under that section the proceedings in the case shall be deemed not to have occurred, sealing or expungement of the following records on which the board has based an action under this section shall have no effect on the board's action or any sanction imposed by the board under this section: records of any conviction, guilty plea, judicial finding of guilt resulting from a plea of no contest, or a judicial finding of eligibility for a pretrial diversion program or intervention in lieu of conviction. The board shall not be required to seal, destroy, redact, or otherwise modify its records to reflect the court's sealing or expungement of conviction records. (F) The board may investigate an individual's criminal background in performing its duties under this section. As part of such investigation, the board may order the individual to submit, at the individual's expense, a request to the bureau of criminal identification and investigation for a criminal records check and check of federal bureau of investigation records in accordance with the procedure described in pursuant to section 4723.091 of the Revised Code. (G) During the course of an investigation conducted under this section, the board may compel any registered nurse, licensed practical nurse, or dialysis technician or applicant under this chapter to submit to a mental or physical examination, or both, as required by the board and at the expense of the individual, if the board finds reason to believe that the individual under investigation may have a physical or mental impairment that may affect the individual's ability to provide safe nursing or dialysis care. The board shall not compel an individual who has been referred to the safe haven program as described in sections 4723.35 and 4723.351 of the Revised Code to submit to a mental or physical examination. Failure of any individual to submit to a mental or physical examination when directed constitutes an admission of the allegations, unless the failure is due to circumstances beyond the individual's control, and a default and final order may be entered without the taking of testimony or presentation of evidence. If the board finds that an individual is impaired, the board shall require the individual to submit to care, counseling, or treatment approved or designated by the board, as a condition for initial, continued, reinstated, or renewed authority to practice. The individual shall be afforded an opportunity to demonstrate to the board that the individual can begin or resume the individual's occupation in compliance with acceptable and prevailing standards of care under the provisions of the individual's authority to practice. For purposes of this division, any registered nurse, licensed practical nurse, or dialysis technician or applicant under this chapter shall be deemed to have given consent to submit to a mental or physical examination when directed to do so in writing by the board, and to have waived all objections to the admissibility of testimony or examination reports that constitute a privileged communication. (H) The board shall investigate evidence that appears to show that any person has violated any provision of this chapter or any rule of the board. Any person may report to the board any information the person may have that appears to show a violation of any provision of this chapter or rule of the board. In the absence of bad faith, any person who reports such information or who testifies before the board in any adjudication conducted under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code shall not be liable for civil damages as a result of the report or testimony. (I) All of the following apply under this chapter with respect to the confidentiality of information: (1) Information received by the board pursuant to a complaint or an investigation is confidential and not subject to discovery in any civil action, except that the board may disclose information to law enforcement officers and government entities for purposes of an investigation of either a licensed health care professional, including a registered nurse, licensed practical nurse, or dialysis technician, or a person who may have engaged in the unauthorized practice of nursing or dialysis care. No law enforcement officer or government entity with knowledge of any information disclosed by the board pursuant to this division shall divulge the information to any other person or government entity except for the purpose of a government investigation, a prosecution, or an adjudication by a court or government entity. (2) If an investigation requires a review of patient records, the investigation and proceeding shall be conducted in such a manner as to protect patient confidentiality. (3) All adjudications and investigations of the board shall be considered civil actions for the purposes of section 2305.252 of the Revised Code. (4) Any board activity that involves continued monitoring of an individual as part of or following any disciplinary action taken under this section shall be conducted in a manner that maintains the individual's confidentiality. Information received or maintained by the board with respect to the board's monitoring activities is not subject to discovery in any civil action and is confidential, except that the board may disclose information to law enforcement officers and government entities for purposes of an investigation of a licensee or certificate holder. (J) Any action taken by the board under this section resulting in a suspension from practice shall be accompanied by a written statement of the conditions under which the person may be reinstated to practice. (K) When the board refuses to grant a license or certificate to an applicant, revokes a license or certificate, or refuses to reinstate a license or certificate, the board may specify that its action is permanent. An individual subject to permanent action taken by the board is forever ineligible to hold a license or certificate of the type that was refused or revoked and the board shall not accept from the individual an application for reinstatement of the license or certificate or for a new license or certificate. (L) No unilateral surrender of a nursing license or dialysis technician certificate issued under this chapter shall be effective unless accepted by majority vote of the board. No application for a nursing license or dialysis technician certificate issued under this chapter may be withdrawn without a majority vote of the board. The board's jurisdiction to take disciplinary action under this section is not removed or limited when an individual has a license or certificate classified as inactive or fails to renew a license or certificate. (M) Sanctions shall not be imposed under division (B)(24) of this section against any licensee who waives deductibles and copayments as follows: (1) In compliance with the health benefit plan that expressly allows such a practice. Waiver of the deductibles or copayments shall be made only with the full knowledge and consent of the plan purchaser, payer, and third-party administrator. Documentation of the consent shall be made available to the board upon request. (2) For professional services rendered to any other person licensed pursuant to this chapter to the extent allowed by this chapter and the rules of the board. Section 2. That existing sections 4723.091, 4723.092, and 4723.28 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. Section 3. This act is hereby declared to be an emergency measure necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety. The reason for such necessity is that enactment into law at the earliest possible time will preserve the confidentiality of Board of Nursing-related criminal records check information and will restrict access to such information only to individuals subject to such checks and to the Board for the purpose of fulfilling specific statutory duties. Therefore, this act shall go into immediate effect. Speaker ___________________ of the House of Representatives. President ___________________ of the Senate. Passed ________________________, 20____ Approved ________________________, 20____ Governor. The section numbering of law of a general and permanent nature is complete and in conformity with the Revised Code. Director, Legislative Service Commission. Filed in the office of the Secretary of State at Columbus, Ohio, on the ____ day of ___________, A. D. 20____. Secretary of State. File No. _________	Effective Date ___________________